test/src/morphology/V-atoske_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskê - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nitatoskân
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kitatoskân
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: atoskêw
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: atoskêyiwa
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nitatoskânân
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kitatoskânaw
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kitatoskânâwâw
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: atoskêwak
     atoskê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl: atoskêyiwa

     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+1Sg: ê-atoskêyân
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+2Sg: ê-atoskêyan
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+3Sg: ê-atoskêt
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+3oSg: ê-atoskêyit
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+1Pl: ê-atoskêyâhk
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+12Pl: ê-atoskêyahk
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+2Pl: ê-atoskêyêk
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+3Pl: ê-atoskêcik
     atoskê+V+IA+Sbj+3oPl: ê-atoskêyit
     
     atoskê+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: atoskê
     atoskê+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: atoskêk
     atoskê+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: atoskêtân
     
     atoskê+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: atoskêhkan
     atoskê+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Pl: atoskêhkêk
     atoskê+V+IA+Imp+Del+12Pl: atoskêhkahk
